apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
    <pardef n="plan__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ned</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ned</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ning</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ning</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ning</l> 
        <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prov/e__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>en</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/ink__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ink</l> 
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ink</l> 
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inks</l> 
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ought</l> 
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ought</l> 
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inking</l> 
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inking</l> 
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inking</l> 
        <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wr/ite__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ite</l> 
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ite</l> 
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ites</l> 
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ote</l> 
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itten</l> 
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iting</l> 
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iting</l> 
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iting</l> 
        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/ing__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ings</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ang</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ung</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inging</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inging</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inging</l> 
        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/eek__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eek</l> 
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eek</l> 
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eeks</l> 
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ought</l> 
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ought</l> 
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eeking</l> 
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eeking</l> 
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eeking</l> 
        <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sh/ear__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ear</l> 
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ear</l> 
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ears</l> 
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eared</l> 
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eared</l> 
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>orn</l> 
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>earing</l> 
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>earing</l> 
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>earing</l> 
        <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sho/e__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eing</l> 
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="ban">
        <i>ban</i> 
        <par n="plan__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="fan">
        <i>fan</i> 
        <par n="plan__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="pin">
        <i>pin</i> 
        <par n="plan__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="plan">
        <i>plan</i> 
        <par n="plan__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="prove">
        <i>prov</i> 
        <par n="prov/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="sing">
        <i>s</i> 
        <par n="r/ing__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="seek">
        <i>s</i> 
        <par n="s/eek__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="scan">
        <i>scan</i> 
        <par n="plan__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="shoe">
        <i>sho</i> 
        <par n="sho/e__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="shun">
        <i>shun</i> 
        <par n="plan__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="shun of">
	    <i>shun</i> 
	    <par n="plan__vblex" sa="sep"/>
	    <p>
		    <l><b/>of<b/></l> 
		    <r><g><b/>of<b/></g></r> 
	    </p>
	    <par n="prsubj__prn"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="sin">
        <i>sin</i> 
        <par n="plan__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="sling">
        <i>sl</i> 
        <par n="r/ing__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="spring">
        <i>spr</i> 
        <par n="r/ing__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="think">
        <i>th</i> 
        <par n="th/ink__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="write">
        <i>wr</i> 
        <par n="wr/ite__vblex"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="write">
        <i>wr</i> 
        <par n="wr/ite__vblex"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>about</l> 
        <r><j/>about<s n="pr"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="underpin">
        <i>underpin</i> 
        <par n="plan__vblex"/> 
    </e>
